Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-606
Fire insurance; premium; policy must state.

Every fire insurance policy must state on its face the amount of the premium.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 113, p. 455;

R.S.1913, § 3250;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. VIII, § 5, p. 635;

C.S.1922, § 7849;

C.S.1929, § 44-705;

R.S.1943, § 44-606.